Washington statutes.
RCW 19.280.060

Department's duties—Report to the legislature.

The department shall review the plans of consumer-owned utilities and investor-owned utilities, and data available from other state, regional, and national sources, and prepare an electronic report to the legislature aggregating the data and assessing the overall adequacy of Washington's electricity supply. The report shall include a statewide summary of utility load forecasts, load/resource balance, and utility plans for the development of thermal generation, renewable resources, conservation and efficiency resources, and an examination of assessment methods used by utilities to address overgeneration events. The commission shall provide the department with data summarizing the plans of investor-owned utilities for use in the department's statewide summary. The department shall submit any reports it receives of existing and potential combined heat and power facilities as reported by utilities to the Washington State University extension energy program for analysis. The department may submit its report within the biennial report required under RCW 43.21F.045.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 10; 2013 c 149 s 4; 2006 c 195 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 39.35.010.